Utah statutes.
35A-3-508.   Inventory of civic organizations.

(1)  To enable the division to refer a client or applicant to an appropriate civic organization under this part, the division, in cooperation with the coalition described in Section 35A-3-510, shall complete a statewide inventory of civic organizations.  For those organizations that wish to participate, the inventory shall include:

(a)  a description of the services and supports provided;

(b)  the geographical locations served;

(c)  methods of accessing services; and

(d)  eligibility for services.

(2)  The inventory shall be stored, updated annually, and made available in a usable form as a resource directory for all employment counselors.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1999 General Session

